Utah statutes.
19-5-118.   Chapter deemed auxiliary and supplementary to other laws.

This chapter does not  repeal any laws relating to the pollution of waters or any conservation laws, but is auxiliary and supplementary to them except to the extent that the  laws are in direct conflict with this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

